Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1814
Mandated project charges; use.

Mandated project charges shall be applied exclusively for the purpose of paying mandated project costs, including any adjustments of such charges pursuant to subdivision (1)(d) of section 70-1812, and financing costs.

Laws 2006, LB 548, § 14.